New York, session 2025-2026, A4250.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The closing paragraph of section 366 of the agriculture 2 and markets law, as amended by chapter 185 of the laws of 2014, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 Any person violating any of the provisions of this section, upon 5 conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding [one] five 6 thousand dollars, or by imprisonment not to exceed [six months] one 7 year, or by both. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08462-01-5